Florida, session 2026, HB833.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb833 -03-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 833, Engrossed 1 2026
Section 1. Subsection (19) of section 1002.42, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
1002.42 Private schools.—
(19) FACILITIES AND LAND USE.—
(a) A private school may use facilities on property owned
or leased by a library, community service organization, museum,
performing arts venue, theater, cinema, or church facility under
s. 170.201, which is or was actively used as such within 5 years
of any executed agreement with a private school to use the
facilities; any facility or land owned by a Florida College
System institution or university; any similar public
institutional facilities; and any facility recently used to
house a school or child care facility licensed under s. 402.305,
under any such facility's preexisting zoning and land use
designations without rezoning or obtaining a special exception
or a land use change, and without complying with any mitigation
requirements or conditions. The facility must be located on
property used solely for purposes described in this paragraph,
and must meet applicable state and local health, safety, and
welfare laws, codes, and rules, including firesafety and
building safety.
(b) A private school may use facilities on property
purchased from a library, community service organization,
museum, performing arts venue, theater, cinema, or church
facility under s. 170.201, which is actively or was actively
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb833 -03-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 833, Engrossed 1 2026
used as such within 5 years of any executed agreement with a
private school to purchase the facilities; any facility or land
owned by a Florida College System institution or university; any
similar public institutional facilities; and any facility
recently used to house a school or child care facility licensed
under s. 402.305, under any such facility's preexisting zoning
and land use designations without obtaining a special exception,
rezoning, or a land use change, and without complying with any
mitigation requirements or conditions. The facility must be
located on property used solely for purposes described in this
paragraph, and must meet applicable state and local health,
safety, and welfare laws, codes, and rules, including firesafety
and building safety.
(c) A private school located in a county with four
incorporated municipalities may construct new facilities, which
may be temporary or permanent, on property purchased from or
owned or leased by a library, community service organization,
museum, performing arts venue, theater, cinema, or church under
s. 170.201, which is or was actively used as such within 5 years
of any executed agreement with a private school; any land owned
by a Florida College System institution or state university; and
any land recently used to house a school or child care facility
licensed under s. 402.305, under its preexisting zoning and land
use designations without rezoning or obtaining a special
exception or a land use change, and without complying with any
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb833 -03-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 833, Engrossed 1 2026
mitigation requirements or conditions. Any new facility must be
located on property used solely for purposes described in this
paragraph, and must meet applicable state and local health,
safety, and welfare laws, codes, and rules, including firesafety
and building safety.
(d) A private school enrolling 150 or fewer students shall
be considered a permitted use in a commercial or mixed-use
zoning district within a county or municipality without rezoning
or obtaining a special exception or a land use change, and
without complying with any mitigation requirements, conditions,
performance standards, ordinances, rules, codes, or policies,
except that a county or municipality may require proportionate
mitigation measures necessary to mitigate vehicular traffic and
pedestrian safety.
1. The vehicular traffic and pedestrian safety mitigation
measures required by a county or municipality pursuant to this
paragraph shall be limited to those impacts reasonably and
directly attributable to the operation of the private school at
the site and shall be no greater in cost or scope than what is
required of all other uses within the same zoning district.
2. The private school subject to vehicular traffic and
pedestrian safety mitigation measures may, in lieu of complying
with such mitigation measures, provide a traffic study that
demonstrates the school will not have disproportionate impact on
100 vehicular traffic or pedestrian safety compared to other
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb833 -03-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 833, Engrossed 1 2026
101 allowable uses within the same zoning district.
102 3. If a local governing authority fails to comply with
103 this paragraph, the aggrieved school or entity has an immediate
104 right to bring an action in circuit court for injunctive relief.
105 (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a private
106 school enrolling 150 or fewer students may operate in a facility
107 that is an existing assembly, day care, mercantile, or business
108 occupancy, as defined in the Florida Fire Prevention Code. A
109 private school operating in such a facility must meet the
110 standards for existing educational occupancy requirements under
111 the Florida Fire Prevention Code, adopted by the State Fire
112 Marshal. Completion of the fire safety evaluation system for
113 educational occupancies in NFPA 101A: Guide on Alternative
114 Approaches to Life Safety, adopted by the State Fire Marshal, by
115 a registered design professional licensed under chapter 471 or
116 chapter 481, with a determination of achieving at a minimum an
117 "at least equivalent" conclusion, shall be considered evidence
118 of compliance with the Florida Fire Prevention Code. The State
119 Fire Marshal may adopt rules to implement this paragraph.
120 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb833 -03-e1